Illinois, session 104th, HB3412.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Preserving Illinois Neighborhoods Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions.7    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 8Opportunity.9    "Eligible property" means residential property that (i) 10has a market value prior to the new construction or 11rehabilitation of $300,000 or less, (ii) is located in a 12qualified area, and (iii) has either (A) been vacant for at 13least 2 years or (B) is or was occupied by a structure that has 14been condemned by the unit of local government in which the 15structure is located.16    "Qualified area" means an area classified as an 17underserved area, as defined in Section 5-5 of the Economic 18Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act, during the 19taxable year.20    "Qualified new construction expenditure" means an expense 21incurred in connection with the construction of a qualified 22new residence on eligible property, including, but not limited 23to, an expense incurred for any of the following: site   HB3412- 2 -LRB104 06143 HLH 18833 b1preparation other than demolition; surveys; architectural and 2engineering services; construction; or any other necessary and 3incidental expense incurred for constructing a qualified new 4residence on the property. Costs paid for by the taxpayer with 5grants or forgivable loans, other than tax credits provided by 6State or federal programs, are not considered qualified new 7construction expenditures.8    "Qualified new residence" means a residential structure 9that is or will be owner-occupied and that is not replacing a 10structure that is listed on the National Register of Historic 11Places or the Illinois Register of Historic Places.12    "Qualified rehabilitation expenditure" means an expense 13incurred for the renovation or rehabilitation of an existing 14single-family residence that is 40 years of age or older, 15including, but not limited to, an expense incurred for any of 16the following: site preparation; surveys; architectural and 17engineering services; or construction, modification, 18expansion, remodeling, or structural alteration of the 19residence. Costs paid for by the taxpayer with grants or 20forgivable loans, other than tax credits provided by State or 21federal programs, are not considered qualified rehabilitation 22expenditures. 23    "Qualified taxpayer" means any taxpayer that is a person, 24partnership, corporation, trust, limited liability company, or 25tax-exempt charitable organization and whose Illinois 26unrelated business taxable income, if any, is subject to the   HB3412- 3 -LRB104 06143 HLH 18833 b1State income tax imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of 2Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.  3    Section 10. Allowable credit; application.4    (a) For taxable years that begin on or after January 1, 52026 and end on or before December 31, 2031, qualified 6taxpayers who incur qualified new construction expenditures or 7qualified rehabilitation expenditures during the taxable year 8are entitled to a credit against the tax imposed by 9subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income 10Tax Act as provided in this Act. Subject to the limitations in 11Section 15, credits under this Act shall be calculated as 12follows:13        (1) 15% of the qualified new construction expenditures 14    incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year 15    in the construction of a qualified new residence in a 16    qualified area;17        (2) 25% of the qualified rehabilitation expenditures 18    incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year 19    in the restoration and preservation of eligible property 20    in a qualified area;21    (b) Taxpayers shall apply to the Department for credits 22under this Act in the form and manner required by the 23Department by rule. A separate application shall be completed 24for each of the taxpayer's projects that are eligible for 25credits under this Act. Upon approval of the complete   HB3412- 4 -LRB104 06143 HLH 18833 b1application, the Department shall issue a tax credit 2certificate in the amount of the eligible credits. The 3taxpayer must attach the certificate to the tax return on 4which the credits are to be claimed. 5    Section 15. Limitations. 6    (a) Tax credits awarded under this Act for qualified new 7construction expenditures shall not exceed $40,000 per 8project. The taxpayer must incur a minimum of $10,000 in 9eligible expenditures with respect to a project to be eligible 10for credits under this Act for that project.11    (b) The Department may not award more than $5,000,000 in 12credits under this Act in any calendar year. Credits shall be 13awarded on a first-come first-served basis, and the Department 14must adopt rules whose goal is to ensure that the tax credits 15are awarded justly and equitably through the State.16    (c) A taxpayer is not eligible for a credit under this 17Section if the taxpayer receives a State income tax credit for 18the same expenditure under any other provision of law. 19    Section 20. Rulemaking. The Department, in consultation 20with the Department of Revenue, shall adopt rules for the 21implementation and administration of this Act. 22    Section 25. Report. The Department shall report to the 23Governor and the General Assembly on the effectiveness of the   HB3412- 5 -LRB104 06143 HLH 18833 b1credits awarded under this Section no later than December 31, 22027 and by December 31 of each odd-numbered year through 3December 31, 2031. 4    Section 30. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 52032. 6    Section 35. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 7adding Section 246 as follows: 8    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)9    Sec. 246. Preserving Illinois Neighborhoods Act. For 10taxable years that begin on or after January 1, 2026 and end on 11or before December 31, 2031, qualified taxpayers who incur 12qualified new construction expenditures or qualified 13rehabilitation expenditures during the taxable year are 14entitled to a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 15(a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act as 16provided in the Preserving Illinois Neighborhoods Act.17    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2032.  18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.